Hawaii statutes.
§187A-13 General penalty; community
service. (a) Any person violating this chapter or any rule adopted
thereunder for which a penalty is not otherwise provided, shall be guilty of a
petty misdemeanor and, in addition to any other penalties, shall be fined not
less than:

(1) $250 for a first offense;

(2) $500 for a second offense; and

(3) $1,000 for a third or subsequent offense.

(b) The court may require the defendant to
complete an aquatic resources educational class administered by the department
in addition to or in lieu of paying all or any part of any monetary fine
authorized by this section.

(c) The court may direct the defendant to
perform community service as administered by the department in lieu of paying
any monetary fine authorized by this section. [L 1985, c 94, pt of §1; am L
1999, c 195, §3; am L 2016, c 67, §1]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next